Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.080

Suspension or modification of requirements authorized.

The council may suspend or modify any of the requirements under this chapter in a particular case if the council finds that:

(1) The suspension or modification is consistent with the purposes of this chapter; and

(2) The education to be offered addresses a substantial, demonstrated need among residents of the state or that literal application of this chapter would cause a manifestly unreasonable hardship.

[ 2012 c 229 s 549; 1986 c 136 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.